District of Columbia statutes.
6-101.03

National Capital Housing Authority — Appropriations; power to borrow money; temporary architectural and engineering services.

(a)

The Mayor is hereby authorized, in his discretion, to make immediately available to the Authority for its lawful uses and as needed, from the allocation made from the appropriation to carry out the purposes of the National Industrial Recovery Act, contained in the Fourth Deficiency Act, fiscal year 1933, now carried under the title, “National Industrial Recovery, Federal Emergency Administration of Public Works, Housing, 1933-1935,” symbol 03/5666, not to exceed $500,000 of any amount thereof dedicated for low-cost housing and slum-clearance projects in the District of Columbia, to be set aside in the Treasury and be known as “Conversion of Inhabited Alleys Fund” (hereinafter referred to as the “Fund”).

(b)

The Authority is hereby authorized and empowered to borrow such moneys from individuals or private corporations as may be secured by the property and assets acquired under the provisions of this subchapter and subchapter II of this chapter, and such moneys, together with all receipts from sales, leases, or other sources, shall be deposited in the Fund and shall be available for the purposes of this subchapter and subchapter II of this chapter. The Authority is hereby authorized and empowered to accept gifts of money from private sources; to borrow from the Treasury of the United States not to exceed $1,000,000 in the fiscal year ending June 30, 1939, and a like sum in each of the 4 succeeding fiscal years, upon such terms and conditions as the Mayor may deem advisable, and appropriations for such purpose are hereby authorized out of the general fund of the Treasury; provided, that the Authority shall be obligated for the payment of interest at the going federal rate as defined in the United States Housing Act of 1937 [42 U.S.C. § 1437 et seq.].

(c)

The Fund shall be available annually in such amount as may be specified in the annual appropriation acts.

(d)

In carrying out the provisions of this subchapter and subchapter II of this chapter, the Authority is hereby authorized and empowered:

(1)

To purchase books of reference, directories, and periodicals that are necessary in connection with its work; and

(2)

To secure architectural and engineering services on specific projects; provided, that this authorization shall not apply to the employment of architects and engineers by the Authority on a permanent basis.

History

June 12, 1934, 48 Stat. 931, ch. 465, § 3
June 25, 1938, 52 Stat. 1187, 1188, ch. 691, §§ 2-4
Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 809, ch. 744, § 9(b)
Apr. 4, 1960, 74 Stat. 12, Pub. L. 86-400, § 1
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(xx), 25 DCR 5740

Cross References

Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-104.
1973 Ed., § 5-105.

References in Text

The United States Housing Act of 1937, referred to in the second sentence in subsection (b) of this section, is the Act of September 1, 1937, ch. 896.

Transfer of Functions

The functions of the President under this section were transferred to the Mayor by § 1-202.02.